Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 6 Implied Consent to Chemical Testing
§ 31-6-103.
Application for hearing; stay of suspension of license; scope of hearing.

A timely request for a hearing shall stay the suspension until the order following the hearing is entered and all appellate review of the matter is completed, provided the stay of suspension is effective only so long as there is no suspension for a similar violation during the hearing and appeal period.

The scope of a hearing for the purposes of this act shall cover the issues of whether a peace officer had probable cause to believe the arrested person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle upon a public street or highway in this state in violation of W.S. 31-5-233(b) or any other law prohibiting driving under the influence as defined by W.S. 31-5-233(a)(v), whether the person was placed under arrest, or if a test was administered, whether the test results indicated that the person had an alcohol concentration of eight one-hundredths of one percent (0.08%) or more, and whether, except for the persons described in this act who are incapable of cooperating with the administration of the test, he had been given the advisements required by W.S. 31-6-102(a)(ii). At the conclusion of the hearing, the hearing examiner shall order that the suspension either be rescinded or sustained. If a chemical test was administered, the hearing examiner has the same authority to modify a license suspension under this act as he does under W.S.

31-7-105

.

Prehearing discovery, available to any interested party is limited to access to the notice of suspension, signed statement and any accompanying documentation submitted by the arresting officer. Other types of discovery available under other law are not available in a hearing under this section.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 158, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 31-247.3; Laws 1985, ch. 211, § 1; ch. 234, § 2; 1986, ch. 75, § 1; 1987, ch. 131, § 1; 1989, ch. 119, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 61, § 1; 2009, ch. 160, § 1; 2011, ch. 178, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “given the advisements required by W.S. 31-6-102(a)(ii)” for “advised that his Wyoming driver's license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle shall be suspended for the period provided by W.S.

31-6-107

if he refused to submit to a test and suspended for ninety (90) days and subject him to criminal penalties if he submitted to the test and the results indicate the person is under the influence of alcohol” in the first sentence of (b).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b), substituted “or if a test was administered” for “whether he refused to submit to a test upon request of the peace officer or if he submitted to a test,” substituted “cooperating with the administration of the test” for “refusing,” deleted “the person submitted to” following “If” in the last sentence, and inserted “was administered.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-6-101(a)(v).

Jurisdiction.—

Office of Administrative Hearings (OAH) had jurisdiction over a driver’s administrative license suspension proceeding where the driver did not challenge the constitutionality of a statute but only asserted that the law enforcement officer did not comply with the law with respect to an independent blood test, and it was within the OAH’s authority to make that factual determination. Johnson v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT, 2020 WY 19, 458 P.3d 40,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2020).

Limitation of discovery. —

Subsection (c) of this section limits discovery and there is no constitutional right to broader discovery, and thus defendant was not entitled to discovery of information concerning equipment used to perform chemical breath analysis. Jones v. State ex rel. Wyoming DOT, 991 P.2d 1251,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 1999).

Probable cause. —

Fact that evidence might have come forth after defendant's arrest, indicating defendant was in a diabetic ketoacidosis state, did not change the conclusion that the State proved under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-6-103(b) that an officer had probable cause at the time to believe defendant was driving while intoxicated; defendant was clocked at 96 miles per hour and had watery eyes, slurred speech, poor balance, and smelled like alcohol.
Wyo. DOT v. State ex rel. DOT, 2012 WY 33, 271 P.3d 1003,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2012), reh'g denied,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. Apr. 3, 2012).

Driver's license suspension proceedings were “instituted,”

within the meaning of § 16-3-113(c), when the department forwarded motorist's request for a hearing to an independent hearing examiner, and not when the officer who arrested her for driving under the influence furnished her with a notice of suspension and a temporary driver's license. Gerstell v. State, 769 P.2d 389,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1989).

Adequate advisement. —

Trooper's
advisement regarding the possible scenario for obtaining a search
warrant and a forcible blood draw based upon it was not misleading,
and it did not trick appellee into consenting to the breath test;
the hearing examiner correctly found that appellee was adequately
advised and not tricked or misled. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT v. Icenhower, 2014 WY 160, 339 P.3d 289,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 2014).

Probable cause. —

Probable cause did not exist to arrest defendant for driving while under the influence of alcohol or controlled substances because, while reasonable suspicion existed to detain defendant beyond the scope of defendant's traffic stop for failing to use turn signals to conduct field sobriety tests, defendant's portable breath test was negative for alcohol and searches of defendant's vehicle and defendant's person prior to defendant's arrest produced no evidence of controlled substances. Vogt v. State ex rel. DOT, 2013 WY 123, 310 P.3d 899,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 2013).

Not necessary to tell arrested driver number of days of possible suspension. —

It is not necessary to tell an arrested driver the specific number of days that his driving privileges may or will be suspended if he refuses to take the chemical test. State v. Marquez, 638 P.2d 1292,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1982), overruled, Olson v. State, 698 P.2d 107,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1985).

Scope of the hearing limited. —

In an administrative
license suspension proceeding, appellant's challenges to the constitutionality
and validity of municipal ordinances were beyond the scope of the
proceeding before the Office of Administrative Hearings (OAH). Appellant's
claim that she had the right to an attorney as soon as she was told
that her choice of submitting to a chemical test would result in
a
possible jail sentence could not have been brought before the OAH
examiner under this section. Walters v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT, 2013 WY 59, 300 P.3d 879,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2013).

Use of implied-consent report form alone is sufficient to support license suspension.

Department of Revenue & Taxation v. Hull, 751 P.2d 351,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1988).

Order set forth sufficient findings of fact to establish that probable cause existed. —

Suspension of a driver's license for failing to submit to a breath test was affirmed where the Office of Administrative Hearings' order set forth findings of fact sufficient to establish that probable cause existed; the signed statement of a deputy who had arrested the driver set forth his observations of the driver, including: (1) the driver's pickup truck appeared to have run off the road; (2) the driver walked with a staggered gait, his speech was slurred, and his breath smelled of alcohol; (3) the driver admitted to having consumed several shots of whisky and some beer, the last of which he consumed only 15 minutes before the deputy arrived; (4) the driver was able to successfully perform only one of five field sobriety tests; and (5) the driver refused to submit to chemical testing. Bradshaw v. Wyo. DOT Drivers' License Div., 2006 WY 70, 135 P.3d 612,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2006).

Arrest report, statement, properly admitted into evidence. —

Where a hearing examiner admitted into evidence the arresting officer's sworn statement and attached arrest report, which established the issues set forth in subsection (b), the hearing examiner complied with this section. Nesius v. State Dep't of Revenue & Taxation, 791 P.2d 939,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1990).

Fruit of poisonous tree doctrine did not apply. —

Fruit of the poisonous tree doctrine did not apply in a license suspension proceeding held under the implied consent statutes, because the officer had probable cause to arrest appellant for interference with a police officer and probable cause to believe appellant was driving under the influence of alcohol. Appellant was hindering the officer's efforts to investigate a hit and run accident involving a vehicle registered to appellant, smelled of alcohol, was swaying, gave the officer a false name, refused to show the officer his driver's license, and refused a breath test; due to the probable cause determination, the fruit of the poisonous tree doctrine did not bar evidence of appellant's arrest in his license suspension proceeding.
Vasco v. State, 2011 WY 100, 253 P.3d 515,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2011).

Quoted in

; Dubbelde v. State ex rel. DOT, 2014 WY 63,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(May 15, 2014).

Romsa v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 153

, 2012 WY 146;

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Nov 20, 2012).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The New Implied Consent Amendments: A Step in the Right Direction,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 165 (1986).

§ 31-6-104.
Right to petition for subsequent hearing; suspension applies to all licenses held; persons not required to take test.

If the suspension is sustained after a hearing, the person whose Wyoming driver’s license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle has been suspended under this act may file a petition within thirty (30) days thereafter for a review of the record in the matter in the district court in the county in which the person resides, or in the case of suspension of a nonresident’s operating privilege, then in Laramie county or the county where the offense is alleged to have occurred. The district court shall immediately set the matter for determination upon thirty (30) days written notice to the department.

A suspension under this act applies to all driver’s licenses held by the person and all driver’s licenses shall be surrendered to the department. The department shall physically retain the license or licenses during the period of suspension except as provided in W.S. 31-7-138(f).

Any person who furnishes proof that he is afflicted with hemophilia is exempt from the blood test required by this act. Any person who is afflicted with a heart condition and is using an anticoagulant under the direction of a physician is exempt from the blood test required by this act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 158, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 31-247.4; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1987, ch. 131, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 31-6-101(a)(v).

Stated

in

Nesius v. State Dep't of Revenue & Taxation, 791 P.2d 939,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1990).

§ 31-6-105.
Method of performing chemical analysis; persons permitted to draw blood; request by arrested person for test; information made available; evidence of refusal to take test.

Chemical analysis of the person’s blood, breath or urine to be considered valid under this section, shall be performed according to methods approved by the department of health and by an individual possessing a valid permit to conduct the analysis. Permits shall be issued by the department of health for this purpose. The department of health may promulgate and approve satisfactory methods in order to ascertain the qualifications of individuals permitted to conduct the analysis and shall issue to qualified individuals permits which are subject to termination or revocation by the department of health.

When a person undergoes a blood test required by a peace officer under this act, only a physician, registered nurse, qualified clinical or laboratory technician or other person who routinely does venipunctures at the direction of a physician may withdraw blood for the purpose of determining the alcohol concentration or controlled substance content therein. This limitation does not apply to the taking of other specimens.

A person arrested for any offense allegedly committed while the person was driving or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance to a degree which renders him incapable of safely driving the vehicle, may request the peace officer to have a chemical test or tests made of the arrested person’s blood, breath or urine for the purpose of determining the alcohol or controlled substance content of the arrested person’s blood. If the tests are available they shall be performed in or near the locality where the arrest was made as promptly as possible after the arrest.

The person tested may, at his own expense, have any qualified person of his own choosing administer a chemical test or tests in addition to any administered at the direction of a peace officer. The failure or inability to obtain an additional test by a person does not preclude the admissibility in evidence of the test or tests taken at the direction of a peace officer.

Upon the request of a person who undergoes a chemical test or tests as required by a peace officer, full information concerning the test or tests shall be made available to the person or his attorney.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 178, § 2.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 158, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 31-247.5; Laws 1973, ch. 195, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-7-133

; Laws 1985, ch. 211, § 1; ch. 234, § 2; 1989, ch. 119, § 2; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2011, ch. 178, §§ 1, 2.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b), substituted “undergoes a blood test required by” for “submits to a blood test at the request of”; in (e), substituted “undergoes” for “submits to,” and “as required by” for “at the request of”; and repealed former (f), pertaining to evidence of refusal to submit to chemical test.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-6-101(a)(v).

Section is constitutional.

City of Laramie v. Mengel, 671 P.2d 340,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 383

(Wyo. 1983).

Discovery. —

State complied with this section when it provided to defendant with the results of his breathalyzer test, the operational checklist used during his tests, the manual for using the subject machine in his case, and the certification records for the machine used. Anderson v. State, 2014 WY 13, 317 P.3d 1108,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2014).

Breathalyzer test results not invalidated by failure to promulgate rules governing chemical testing. —

Where the department of health and social services (now department of health), under subsection (a), approved the method of testing for chemical sobriety, its failure to promulgate rules governing chemical testing results pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (chapter 3 of title 16) did not invalidate the breathalyzer test results of the defendant, arrested for driving under the influence. Wheeler v. State, 705 P.2d 861,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 557

(Wyo. 1985).

Valid permit. —

The plain and ordinary meaning of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-6-105(b) requires testing to be performed by a person who possesses a valid permit, who may or may not be the arresting officer, only when a chemical analysis of the person's blood, breath, or urine is performed, and where testing was never performed, the question of whether the officer, or whoever would have conducted the test, possessed a valid permit was irrelevant. Bryant v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT, 2002 WY 140, 55 P.3d 4,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 2002), op. withdrawn,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. Sept. 25, 2002).

Driver's per se driver's license suspension stood as the test operator's permit was valid, as she had not been notified otherwise,
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-6-105(a).
Miller v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT, 283 P.3d 1153, 2012 WY 115,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Aug 31, 2012).

Validity of chemical test result. —

Certified record at the administrative hearing established that the arresting officer performed the chemical analysis of the motorist's breath according to methods approved under this section, and as a result, it was proper for the Office of Administrative Hearings to apply a mandatory presumption that the underlying chemical test result was valid. Romsa v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT, 2012 WY 146, 288 P.3d 695,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 2012).

Test of urine sample. —

Sample of
defendant's urine, which was drawn from a catheter by a nurse in
a
hospital, was admissible in defendant's trial for driving while
under
the influence of alcohol because it was collected in a manner
that
was statutorily authorized. Stowe v. State, 2014 WY 97, 331 P.3d 127,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2014).

Observation period. —

In a licence suspension case, the hearing examiner's decision that the officer complied with the 15 minute observation period for admission of a chemical test pursuant to this section was supported by the Operational Checklist showing appellant was observed for an eighteen-minute period before his breath sample was taken.
Hwang v. State, 2011 WY 20, 247 P.3d 861,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 2011).

Suspect may withdraw consent to test. —

Under § 31-6-102(c), a test may be given without there being consent, an arrest or the need to convey any information to the individual in question, but the suspect may, at the appropriate time, withdraw his consent, i.e., when he is conscious or becomes capable of refusing. State v. Chastain, 594 P.2d 458,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 416

(Wyo. 1979), overruled, Olson v. State, 698 P.2d 107,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1985).

Finding that registered nurse drew blood supported by initials “RN” on applicable form. —

An individual who certified that she drew blood samples and wrote the initials “RN” on the applicable form may be found by the trier of fact to be a registered nurse under subsection (b), as it is generally recognized by the majority of the people that the initials “RN” are an abbreviation for registered nurse. Joelson v. State, 674 P.2d 229,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 240

(Wyo. 1984).

Applied

in

Miller v. Wyo. Dep't of Health, 2012 WY 65, 275 P.3d 1257,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(May 9, 2012).

Cited

in

Jones v. State ex rel. Wyoming DOT, 991 P.2d 1251,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 1999).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Breathalyzers: Should the State Be Required to Preserve the Ampoules?” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 299 (1980).

For comment, “The New Implied Consent Amendments: A Step in the Right Direction,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 165 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Duty of law enforcement officer to offer suspect chemical sobriety test under implied consent law, 95 ALR3d 710.

Admissibility in criminal case of evidence that accused refused to take test of intoxication, 26 ALR4th 1112.

Consumption or destruction of physical evidence due to testing or analysis by prosecution's expert as warranting suppression of evidence or dismissal of case against accused in state court, 40 ALR4th 594.

Motorist's right to private sobriety test, 45 ALR4th 11.

Sufficiency of showing of physical inability to take tests for driving while intoxicated to justify refusal, 68 ALR4th 776.

Authentication of blood sample taken from human body for purposes of determining blood alcohol content, 76 ALR5th 1.

Admissibility and sufficiency of extrapolation evidence in DUI prosecutions, 119 ALR5th 379.

§ 31-6-106.
No liability incurred by persons requested to administer test.

No physician, registered nurse, qualified clinical or laboratory technician or other person who routinely does venipunctures at the direction of a physician or facility in which the blood is drawn shall incur any civil or criminal liability as a result of the proper administration of a blood test when requested in writing by a peace officer or any other person to administer the test.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 158, § 6; W.S. 1957 § 31-246.6; Laws 1985, ch. 211, § 1; ch. 234, § 2.

§ 31-6-107.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 178, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to ignition interlock licenses, see §

31-7-401

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1989, ch. 119, § 1, related to penalty for refusal to submit to chemical testing.

Laws 2011, ch. 178, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

Proof of probable cause to arrest. —

Suspension of a driver's license for failing to submit to a breath test was affirmed where the Office of Administrative Hearings' order set forth findings of fact sufficient to establish that probable cause existed; the signed statement of a deputy who had arrested the driver set forth his observations of the driver, including: (1) the driver's pickup truck appeared to have run off the road; (2) the driver walked with a staggered gait, his speech was slurred, and his breath smelled of alcohol; (3) the driver admitted to having consumed several shots of whisky and some beer, the last of which he consumed only 15 minutes before the deputy arrived; (4) the driver was able to successfully perform only one of five field sobriety tests; and (5) the driver refused to submit to chemical testing. Bradshaw v. Wyo. DOT Drivers' License Div., 2006 WY 70, 135 P.3d 612,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2006).

Order set forth sufficient findings of fact to establish thatprobable cause existed. —

Suspension of a driver's license for failing to submit to a breath test was affirmed where the Office of Administrative Hearings' order set forth findings of fact sufficient to establish that probable cause existed; the signed statement of a deputy who had arrested the driver set forth his observations of the driver, including: (1) the driver's pickup truck appeared to have run off the road; (2) the driver walked with a staggered gait, his speech was slurred, and his breath smelled of alcohol; (3) the driver admitted to having consumed several shots of whisky and some beer, the last of which he consumed only 15 minutes before the deputy arrived; (4) the driver was able to successfully perform only one of five field sobriety tests; and (5) the driver refused to submit to chemical testing. Bradshaw v. Wyo. DOT Drivers' License Div., 2006 WY 70, 135 P.3d 612,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2006).

Intentional refusal. —

Substantial evidence supported a hearing examiner's finding that a motorist intentionally failed or refused to perform a breath test after the motorist was arrested for driving under the influence of intoxicating liquor. Intentional failure constituted a refusal to take the breath test, which refusal led to the statutory implied consent suspension of the motorist's driving privileges and the additional statutory disqualification from driving a commercial motor vehicle.
Faber v. State, 2009 WY 137, 220 P.3d 236,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 2009).

Detention by Bureau of Indian Affairs officers. —

Driver's detention by Bureau of Indian Affairs (BIA) officers for driving while under the influence (DWUI) did not render his subsequent arrest by deputy sheriff unlawful because the driver could not have been arrested and prosecuted within the tribal court system as he was not a tribal member, and he could not have been arrested by the BIA officer and prosecuted within the federal system because the DWUI offense was a State offense, he was therefore subject to arrest and prosecution by the State. The BIA officer properly detained the driver for formal arrest by a state officer, and the deputy sheriff had the authority to enforce the DWUI and implied consent statutes.
Colyer v. State, 2009 WY 43, 203 P.3d 1104,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2009).

Cited

in

Farmer v. State, Dep't of Transp., 986 P.2d 165,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1999); Hittner v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT (In re Hittner), 2008 WY 91, 189 P.3d 872,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Aug. 1, 2008).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Driving while intoxicated: subsequent consent to sobriety test as affecting initial refusal, 28 ALR5th 459.

Mental incapacity as justifying refusal to submit to tests for driving while intoxicated, 76 ALR5th 597.

§ 31-6-108.
Implied consent requirements for youthful drivers.

If arrested for an offense as defined by W.S.

31-5-234

:

A person under twenty-one (21) years of age who drives or is in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state is deemed to have given consent, subject to the provisions of this section, to a chemical test or tests of his blood, breath or urine for the purpose of determining alcohol concentration in his blood;

The test or tests shall be administered at the direction of a peace officer, who has probable cause to believe that the driver was driving or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle in this state in violation of W.S.

31-5-234

(b). The peace officer who requires a test pursuant to this section may direct that the test shall be of blood, breath or urine. However, if the officer directs that the test be of the person’s blood or urine, the person may choose whether the test shall be of blood or urine;

The test or tests results shall only be used for the purposes of determining the chemical concentration as provided by this section and shall not be used for any other purpose.

For tests required under this section, the person shall be advised that:

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 178, § 2.

If the results of the test indicate an alcohol concentration of two one-hundredths of one percent (0.02%) or more, he may be subject to denial or suspension of his driver’s license for the period specified by W.S. 31-7-128(h) and he may be required to drive only vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device;

After all chemical tests required by the peace officer have been administered at a place and in the manner prescribed by and at the expense of the agency employing the peace officer, the arrested person may go to the nearest hospital or clinic and secure any additional tests at his own expense.

Results of tests obtained at the person’s expense shall be made available to the peace officer and the person. Disclosure of the test results by the person administering the test is not a violation of the doctor-patient relationship.

Any person dead, unconscious or otherwise in a condition rendering him incapable of cooperating with the administration of the tests is deemed to have given his consent provided for in this section, and the tests may be administered subject to this section. A chemical test designated by the agency employing the peace officer may also be administered to a person who refuses to take a test upon issuance of a search warrant, including a remotely communicated search warrant, as provided in W.S. 31-6-102(d). A remotely communicated search warrant shall be valid only for purposes specified in this subsection.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 178, § 2.

If a test discloses an alcohol concentration of two one-hundredths of one percent (0.02%) or more, the peace officer shall issue the person a temporary license similar to but in lieu of the license authorized under W.S.

31-7-138

. This temporary license shall be valid for thirty (30) days, shall not be renewed, shall contain a notice that the person has twenty (20) days from the date of issuance within which to request a hearing from the department pursuant to W.S.

31-7-105

and that failure to timely request a hearing will result in the period of suspension or license denial automatically commencing upon expiration of the temporary license or upon expiration of any existing suspension or revocation if the person’s license or privilege is suspended or revoked at the time the temporary license is issued. For purposes of this section, the peace officer acts as an agent for the department when providing notice of the suspension and notice of the opportunity for a hearing. W.S.

31-7-137

applies to a notice under this act. Failure to demand a hearing within the twenty (20) day period is a waiver of the right of hearing, and the period of suspension or denial shall commence upon expiration of the temporary license or upon expiration of any existing suspension or revocation if the person’s license or privilege is suspended or revoked at the time the temporary license is issued. A temporary license issued under this subsection shall afford no driving privilege to a person who is not otherwise licensed to drive a motor vehicle.

A timely request for a hearing shall stay the period of suspension or denial until the order following the hearing is entered and all appellate review of the matter is completed, provided the stay is effective only so long as there is no license suspension or denial for a similar violation during the hearing and appeal period.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the hearing examiner shall order whether or not the person’s driver’s license shall be suspended or denied. The scope of the hearing shall be limited to the issues of:

Whether the peace officer had probable cause to believe the person was driving or in actual physical control of a vehicle with an alcohol concentration of two one-hundredths of one percent (0.02%) or more;

Whether the results of a test indicated there was an alcohol concentration of two one-hundredths of one percent (0.02%) or more;

Whether the person had been given the advisement required in subsection (b) of this section; and

Whether the person has shown good cause as to why his license should not be suspended or denied, regardless of the findings in paragraphs (i) through (iii) of this subsection.

Prehearing discovery available to any party is limited to access to the signed statement and any accompanying documentation submitted by the peace officer. Other types of discovery available under other laws are not available under this section.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 178, § 2.

W.S. 31-6-102(g), 31-6-104(c), 31-6-105(a), (b) and (e) and

31-6-106

apply to this section.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 178, § 2.

Records of convictions or license suspensions under this section shall not be made a part of the abstracts or records kept by the department of transportation pursuant to W.S.

31-5-1214

or

31-7-120

. Any records maintained by the department for administration of this section shall be maintained separately and shall not be available for public inspection except for inspection by any law enforcement officer or agency to enforce the provisions of this section. Any driver’s license suspension or related records under this section shall not be the basis for any increase in insurance premiums or the cancellation of any insurance policy for a minor or his parents affected by this section.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 178, § 2.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 102, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 93, § 1; 2009, ch. 160, § 1; 2011, ch. 178, §§ 1, 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “and he may be required to drive only vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device” at the end of (b)(i) and at the end of (b)(ii); and added (p).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (a)(iii); repealed former (b)(i), pertaining to suspension of license for failure to submit to required chemical tests; in (b)(ii), deleted “a test is taken and” following “If” and inserted “of the test”; in (b)(iii), substituted “After all chemical tests required by the peace officer have been administered” for “After submitting to all required chemical tests requested by the peace officer”; in (d), substituted “cooperating with the administration of” for “refusal to submit to,” and added the last two sentences; repealed former (e), pertaining to refusal of chemical testing; in (f), substituted “If a test” for “If the person refuses testing or submits to a test which”; (h)(ii), deleted “person refused to submit to a test or if he submitted to a test, the” following “Whether the” and inserted “of a test”; repealed former (k), pertaining to admissible evidence of refusal in any action; repealed former (n), pertaining to receipt of statements regarding refusal to submit to tests; and repealed former (p) pertaining to a second or subsequent suspension of driver's license.

Editor's notes. —

There are no subsections (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act”, referred to in the third sentence of subsection (f), see § 31-6-101(a)(v).